Utah statutes.
26-20-12.   Violation of other laws.

(1)  The provisions of this chapter are:

(a)  not exclusive, and the remedies provided for in this chapter are in addition to any other remedies provided for under:

(i)  any other applicable law; or

(ii)  common law; and

(b)  to be liberally construed and applied to:

(i)  effectuate the chapter's remedial and deterrent purposes; and

(ii)  serve the public interest.

(2)  If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstance is held unconstitutional:

(a)  the remaining provisions of this chapter are not affected; and

(b)  the application of this chapter to other persons or circumstances are not affected.

